Nebraska, session 109, LB137.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB137 LB137
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) No homeowners association as defined in section
18-3102 or similar mutual benefit association or corporation organized
for the purpose of enforcing restrictive covenants established on real
property shall adopt or enforce any instrument governing or regulating
the ownership or use of real property including, but not limited to, any
covenant, declaration, bylaw, deed, contract or other agreement, term,
provision, or condition, which purports to prohibit or outright restrict
the installation or use of a solar energy collector or solar energy
system, the building of structures that facilitate the collection of
solar energy in any form, or a pollinator garden. Any such instrument
shall be void and unenforceable.
(2) No homeowners association as defined in section 18-3102 or
similar mutual benefit association or corporation organized for the
purpose of enforcing restrictive covenants established on real property
shall assess or charge a homeowner any fee for the placement of any solar
energy collector, solar energy system, or pollinator garden.
(3) Any existing covenant, declaration, bylaw, deed, contract or
other agreement, term, provision, or condition that violates subsection
(1) of this section is void and unenforceable.
(4) A homeowner shall have a civil cause of action against any
homeowners association or similar mutual benefit association or
corporation described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section or any
other person for a violation of this section.
Sec. 2. For purposes of section 1 of this act:
(1) Pollinator garden means a garden of any size that is (a)
designed to support pollinators, such as bees, butterflies, and
hummingbirds, by providing food, water, and shelter and (b) in compliance
with political subdivision pollinator garden programs;
(2) Solar energy collector has the same meaning as defined in
section 66-904; and
(3) Solar energy system has the same meaning as defined in section
-2-

LB137 LB137
2025 2025
66-905.
Sec. 3. The Revisor of Statutes shall assign sections 1 and 2 of
this act to Chapter 76.
-3-